North Carolina statutes. Chapter 17. Habeas Corpus.
Article 4. Return.

§ 17-13.
When writ returnable.

Writs of habeas corpus may be made returnable at a certain time, or forthwith, as the case may require. If the writ be returnable at a certain time, such return shall be made and the party shall be produced at the time and place specified therein.

History.

1868-9, c. 116, s. 31; Code, s. 1656; Rev., s. 1830; C.S., s. 2215.

§ 17-14.
Contents of return; verification.

The person or officer on whom the writ is served must make a return thereto in writing, and, except where such person is a sworn public officer and makes his return in his official capacity, it must be verified by his oath. The return must state plainly and unequivocally —

Whether he has or has not the party in his custody or under his power or restraint.

If he has the party in his custody or power, or under his restraint, the authority and the cause of such imprisonment or restraint, setting forth the same at large.

If the party is detained by virtue of any writ, warrant, or other written authority, a copy thereof shall be annexed to the return; and the original shall be produced and exhibited on the return of the writ to the court or judge before whom the same is returnable.

If the person or officer upon whom such writ is served has had the party in his power or custody, or under his restraint, at any time prior or subsequent to the date of the writ, but has transferred such custody or restraint to another, the return shall state particularly to whom, at what time, for what cause and by what authority such transfer took place.

History.

1868-9, c. 116, s. 11; Code, s. 1633; Rev., s. 1831; C.S., s. 2216.

§ 17-15.
Production of body if required.

If the writ requires it, the officer or person on whom the same has been served shall also produce the body of the party in his custody or power, according to the command of the writ, except in the case of the sickness of such party, as hereinafter provided.

History.

1868-9, c. 116, s. 14; Code, s. 1636; Rev., s. 1832; C.S., s. 2217.